California statutes. Penal Code
(C) The prize total.

(D) The winning ticket number and whether the prize was claimed.

(13) (A) Once registered, an eligible organization shall file with the department, each season or year thereafter, a report that includes all of the following information:

(i) For each raffle, all of the following information:

(I) The gross receipts generated from the sale of raffle tickets.

(II) Each eligible recipient organization and the amount each eligible recipient organization received.

(III) The prize total.

(IV) The winning ticket number and whether the prize was claimed.

(ii) The total number of raffles conducted for the season or year.

(iii) The gross receipts generated from the sale of raffle tickets for the season or year.

(iv) The average per raffle gross receipts generated from the sale of raffle tickets for the season or year.

(v) The prize total for the season or year, including any prize that was not claimed.

(vi) The average per raffle prize total for the season or year, including any prize that was not claimed.

(vii) The prize total that was not claimed, if any, during the season or year. For each raffle in which the prize was not claimed, the name of the eligible recipient organization who received the prize.

(viii) A schedule of all vendors used to operate the raffles and total payments made to each vendor.

(ix) An itemization of the direct costs of conducting the raffles, including labor, raffle equipment, software, marketing, and consulting costs.

(B) Failure to timely submit the seasonal or annual report to the department, as required in this paragraph, shall be grounds for denial of an annual registration and for the imposition of penalties under Section 12591.1 of the Government Code.

(C) Failure to submit a complete financial report shall be grounds for the denial of an annual registration and for the imposition of penalties under Section 12591.1 of the Government Code if the filer does not resubmit a complete form within 30 days of receiving a notice of incomplete filing.

(D) (i) An eligible organization shall file with the department and post on either its internet website or the affiliated sport team’s internet website the report required by this paragraph no later than 60 days after the end of the league season or year.

(ii) The department shall post the reports required by this paragraph on its internet website, but shall not post the report on the online search portal of the Attorney General’s Registry of Charitable Trusts maintained pursuant to Section 12584 of the Government Code.

(14) The department shall annually furnish to registrants a form to collect this information.

(o) The department may take legal action against a registrant if it determines that the registrant has violated this section or a regulation adopted pursuant to this section, or that the registrant has engaged in any conduct that is not
 in the best interests of the public’s health, safety, or general welfare. An action taken pursuant to this subdivision does not prohibit the commencement of an administrative or criminal action by the Attorney General, a district attorney, city attorney, or county counsel.

(p) An action and hearing conducted to deny, revoke, or suspend a registry, or other administrative action taken against a registrant, shall be conducted pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapters 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) and 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The department may seek civil remedies, including imposing
 fines, for violations of this section, and may seek recovery of the costs incurred in investigating or prosecuting an action against a registrant or applicant in accordance with those procedures specified in Section 125.3 of the Business and Professions Code. A proceeding conducted under this subdivision is subject to judicial review pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure. A violation of this section shall not constitute a crime.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 584, Sec. 3.   (SB 451)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

321.

Every person who sells, gives, or in any manner whatever, furnishes or transfers to or for any other person any ticket, chance, share, or interest, or any paper, certificate, or instrument purporting or understood to be or to represent any ticket, chance, share, or interest in, or depending upon the event of any lottery, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

322.

Every person who aids or assists, either by printing, writing, advertising, publishing, or otherwise in setting up, managing, or drawing any lottery, or in selling or disposing of any ticket, chance, or share therein, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

323.

Every person who opens, sets up, or keeps, by himself or by any other person, any office or other place for the sale of, or for registering the number of any ticket in any lottery, or who, by printing, writing, or otherwise, advertises or publishes the setting up, opening, or using of any such office, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

324.

Every person who insures or receives any consideration for insuring for or against the drawing of any ticket in any lottery whatever, whether drawn or to be drawn within this State or not, or who receives any valuable consideration upon any agreement to repay any sum, or deliver the same, or any other property, if any lottery ticket or number of any ticket in any lottery shall prove fortunate or unfortunate, or shall be drawn or not be drawn, at any particular time or in any particular order, or who promises or agrees to pay any sum of money, or to deliver any goods, things in action, or property, or to forbear to do anything for the benefit of any person, with or without consideration, upon any
 event or contingency dependent on the drawing of any ticket in any lottery, or who publishes any notice or proposal of any of the purposes aforesaid, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

325.

All moneys and property offered for sale or distribution in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter are forfeited to the state, and may be recovered by information filed, or by an action brought by the Attorney General, or by any district attorney, in the name of the state. Upon the filing of the information or complaint, the clerk of the court must issue an attachment against the property mentioned in the complaint or information, which attachment has the same force and effect against such property, and is issued in the same manner as attachments issued from the superior courts in civil cases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1257.)
-------------------------------------------

326.

Every person who lets, or permits to be used, any building or vessel, or any portion thereof, knowing that it is to be used for setting up, managing, or drawing any lottery, or for the purpose of selling or disposing of lottery tickets, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

326.5.

(a) Neither the prohibition on gambling in this chapter nor in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 330) applies to any bingo game that is conducted in a city, county, or city and county pursuant to an ordinance enacted under Section 19 of Article IV of the State Constitution, if the ordinance allows games to be conducted only in accordance with this section and only by organizations exempted from the payment of the bank and corporation tax by Sections 23701a, 23701b, 23701d, 23701e, 23701f, 23701g, 23701k, 23701w, and 23701l of the Revenue and Taxation Code and by mobilehome park associations, senior citizens organizations, and charitable organizations affiliated with a school district; and if the receipts of those games are used only for charitable purposes.

(b) It is a misdemeanor for any person to receive or pay a profit, wage, or salary from any bingo game authorized by Section 19 of Article IV of the State Constitution. Security personnel employed by the organization conducting the bingo game may be paid from the revenues of bingo games, as provided in subdivisions (j) and (k).

(c) A violation of subdivision (b) shall be punishable by a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), which fine is deposited in the general fund of the city, county, or city and county that enacted the ordinance authorizing the bingo game. A violation of any provision of this section, other than subdivision (b), is a misdemeanor.

(d) The city, county, or city and county that enacted the ordinance authorizing the bingo game may bring an action to enjoin a violation of this section.

(e) Minors shall not be allowed to participate in any bingo game.

(f) An organization authorized to conduct bingo games pursuant to subdivision (a) shall conduct a bingo game only on property owned or leased by it, or property whose use is donated to the organization, and which property is used by that organization for an office or for performance of the purposes for which the organization is organized. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require that the property owned or leased by, or whose use is donated to, the organization be used or leased exclusively by, or donated exclusively to, that organization.

(g) All bingo games shall be open to the public, not just to the members of the authorized organization.

(h) A bingo game shall be operated and staffed only by members of the authorized
 organization that organized it. Those members shall not receive a profit, wage, or salary from any bingo game. Only the organization authorized to conduct a bingo game shall operate such a game, or participate in the promotion, supervision, or any other phase of a bingo game. This subdivision does not preclude the employment of security personnel who are not members of the authorized organization at a bingo game by the organization conducting the game.

(i) Any individual, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, except the organization authorized to conduct a bingo game, shall not hold a financial interest in the conduct of a bingo game.

(j) With respect to organizations exempt from payment of the bank and corporation tax by Section 23701d of the Revenue and Taxation Code, all profits derived from a bingo game shall be kept in a special fund or account and shall not be
 commingled with any other fund or account. Those profits shall be used only for charitable purposes.

(k) With respect to other organizations authorized to conduct bingo games pursuant to this section, all proceeds derived from a bingo game shall be kept in a special fund or account and shall not be commingled with any other fund or account. Proceeds are the receipts of bingo games conducted by organizations not within subdivision (j). Those proceeds shall be used only for charitable purposes, except as follows:

(1) The proceeds may be used for prizes.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (C), the portion of the proceeds that may be used for the rental of property and for overhead, including the purchase of bingo equipment, administrative expenses, security equipment, and security personnel
 shall be the lower of either of the following:

(i) Twenty percent of the proceeds before the deduction for prizes.

(ii) Beginning January 1, 2025, three thousand dollars ($3,000) per month, increased annually by the annual average percentage in the Consumer Price Index for the preceding calendar year.

(B) For the purposes of this subdivision, the term “Consumer Price Index” means the California Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers published by the Department of Industrial Relations.

(C) For the purposes of bingo games conducted by the Lake Elsinore Elks Lodge, a portion of the proceeds, not to exceed 20 percent of the proceeds before the deduction for prizes, or three thousand dollars ($3,000) per month, whichever is less, may be used for the
 rental of property and for overhead, including the purchase of bingo equipment, administrative expenses, security equipment, and security personnel. Any amount of the proceeds that is additional to that permitted under subparagraph (A), up to one thousand dollars ($1,000), shall be used for the purpose of financing the rebuilding of the facility and the replacement of equipment that was destroyed by fire in 2007. The exception to subparagraph (A) that is provided by this subparagraph shall remain in effect only until the cost of rebuilding the facility is repaid, or January 1, 2019, whichever occurs first.

(3) The proceeds may be used to pay license fees.

(4) A city, county, or city and county that enacts an ordinance permitting bingo games may specify in the ordinance that if the monthly gross receipts from bingo games of an organization within this subdivision exceed five
 thousand dollars ($5,000), a minimum percentage of the proceeds shall be used only for charitable purposes not relating to the conducting of bingo games and that the balance shall be used for prizes, rental of property, overhead, administrative expenses, and payment of license fees. The amount of proceeds used for rental of property, overhead, and administrative expenses is subject to the limitations specified in paragraph (2).

(l) (1) A city, county, or city and county may impose a license fee on each organization that it authorizes to conduct bingo games. The fee, whether for the initial license or renewal, shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50) annually, except as provided in paragraph (2). If an application for a license is denied, one-half of any license fee paid shall be refunded to the organization.

(2) In lieu of the license fee permitted under
 paragraph (1), a city, county, or city and county may impose a license fee of fifty dollars ($50) paid upon application. If an application for a license is denied, one-half of the application fee shall be refunded to the organization. An additional fee for law enforcement and public safety costs incurred by the city, county, or city and county that are directly related to bingo activities may be imposed and shall be collected monthly by the city, county, or city and county issuing the license; however, the fee shall not exceed the actual costs incurred in providing the service.

(m) A person shall not be allowed to participate in a bingo game, unless the person is physically present at the time and place where the bingo game is being conducted.

(n) The total value of prizes available to be awarded during the conduct of any bingo games shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) in
 cash or kind, or both, for each separate game which is held.

(o) As used in this section, “bingo” means a game of chance in which prizes are awarded on the basis of designated numbers or symbols that are marked or covered by the player on a tangible card in the player’s possession and that conform to numbers or symbols, selected at random and announced by a live caller. Notwithstanding Section 330c, as used in this section, the game of bingo includes tangible cards having numbers or symbols that are concealed and preprinted in a manner providing for distribution of prizes. Electronics or video displays shall not be used in connection with the game of bingo, except in connection with the caller’s drawing of numbers or symbols and the public display of that drawing, and except as provided in subdivision (p). The winning cards shall not be known prior to the game by any person participating in the playing or operation of the bingo game. All
 preprinted cards shall bear the legend, “for sale or use only in a bingo game authorized under California law and pursuant to local ordinance.” Only a covered or marked tangible card possessed by a player and presented to an attendant may be used to claim a prize. It is the intention of the Legislature that bingo as defined in this subdivision applies exclusively to this section and shall not be applied in the construction or enforcement of any other provision of law.

(p) (1) Players who are physically present at a bingo game may use hand-held, portable card-minding devices, as described in this subdivision, to assist in monitoring the numbers or symbols announced by a live caller as those numbers or symbols are called in a live game. Card-minding devices may not be used in connection with any game where a bingo card may be sold or distributed after the start of the ball draw for that game. A card-minding device shall do
 all of the following:

(A) Be capable of storing in the memory of the device bingo faces of tangible cards purchased by a player.

(B) Provide a means for bingo players to input manually each individual number or symbol announced by a live caller.

(C) Compare the numbers or symbols entered by the player to the bingo faces previously stored in the memory of the device.

(D) Identify winning bingo patterns that exist on the stored bingo faces.

(2) A card-minding device shall perform no functions involving the play of the game other than those described in paragraph (1). Card-minding devices shall not do any of the following:

(A) Be capable of accepting or dispensing any coins, currency, or other representative of value or on which value has been encoded.

(B) Be capable of monitoring any bingo card face other than the faces of the tangible bingo card or cards purchased by the player for that game.

(C) Display or represent the game result through any means, including, but not limited to, video or mechanical reels or other slot machine or casino game themes, other than highlighting the winning numbers or symbols marked or covered on the tangible bingo cards or giving an audio alert that the player’s card has a prize-winning pattern.

(D) Determine the outcome of any game or be physically or electronically connected to any component that determines the outcome of a game or to any other bingo equipment, including, but not limited
 to, the ball call station, or to any other card-minding device. No other player-operated or player-activated electronic or electromechanical device or equipment is permitted to be used in connection with a bingo game.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 76, Sec. 5.   (SB 860)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

327.

Every person who contrives, prepares, sets up, proposes, or operates any endless chain is guilty of a public offense, and is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year or in state prison for 16 months, two, or three years.

As used in this section, an “endless chain” means any scheme for the disposal or distribution of property whereby a participant pays a valuable consideration for the chance to receive compensation for introducing one or more additional persons into participation in the scheme or for the chance to receive compensation when a person introduced by the participant introduces a
 new participant. Compensation, as used in this section, does not mean or include payment based upon sales made to persons who are not participants in the scheme and who are not purchasing in order to participate in the scheme.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 436, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

328.

(a) This chapter does not make unlawful the printing or other production of any advertisements for, or any ticket, chance, or share in a lottery conducted in any other state or nation where such lottery is not prohibited by the laws of such state or nation; or the sale of such materials by the manufacturer thereof to any person or entity conducting or participating in the conduct of such a lottery in any such state or nation.

(b) This chapter does not make unlawful the placement or operation of, or communication to and from, equipment located in the State of California associated with the hosting of lottery games duly authorized by another state or jurisdiction provided that persons wagering on those games are required by the laws or regulations of the other state or jurisdiction to be physically located within the geographic bounds of that other state or jurisdiction at the time the wager is initiated or placed.

(c) This section does not authorize any advertisement within California relating to lotteries, the sale or resale within California of lottery tickets, chances, or shares to individuals, or acts otherwise in violation of any laws of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   (SB 1523)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

329.

Upon a trial for the violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, it is not necessary to prove the existence of any lottery in which any lottery ticket purports to have been issued, or to prove the actual signing of any such ticket or share, or pretended ticket or share, of any pretended lottery, nor that any lottery ticket, share, or interest was signed or issued by the authority of any manager, or of any person assuming to have authority as manager; but in all cases proof of the sale, furnishing, bartering, or procuring of any ticket, share, or interest therein, or of any instrument purporting to be a ticket, or part or share of any such ticket, is
 evidence that such share or interest was signed and issued according to the purport thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 897, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Gaming [330. - 337z.]

330.

Every person who deals, plays, or carries on, opens, or causes to be opened, or who conducts, either as owner or employee, whether for hire or not, any game of faro, monte, roulette, lansquenet, rouge et noire, rondo, tan, fan-tan, seven-and-a-half, twenty-one, hokey-pokey, or any banking or percentage game played with cards, dice, or any device, for money, checks, credit, or other representative of value, and every person who plays or bets at or against any of those prohibited games, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punishable by a fine not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 71, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

330a.

(a) Every person, who has in his or her possession or under his or her control, either as owner, lessee, agent, employee, mortgagee, or otherwise, or who permits to be placed, maintained, or kept in any room, space, inclosure, or building owned, leased, or occupied by him or her, or under his or her management or control, any slot or card machine, contrivance, appliance or mechanical device, upon the result of action of which money or other valuable thing is staked or hazarded, and which is operated, or played, by placing or depositing therein any coins, checks, slugs, balls, or other articles or device, or in any other manner and by means whereof, or as a result of the operation of which any merchandise, money, representative or articles of value,
 checks, or tokens, redeemable in or exchangeable for money or any other thing of value, is won or lost, or taken from or obtained from the machine, when the result of action or operation of the machine, contrivance, appliance, or mechanical device is dependent upon hazard or chance, and every person, who has in his or her possession or under his or her control, either as owner, lessee, agent, employee, mortgagee, or otherwise, or who permits to be placed, maintained, or kept in any room, space, inclosure, or building owned, leased, or occupied by him or her, or under his or her management or control, any card dice, or any dice having more than six faces or bases each, upon the result of action of which any money or other valuable thing is staked or hazarded, or as a result of the operation of which any merchandise, money, representative or article of value, check or token, redeemable in or exchangeable for money or any other thing of value, is won or lost or taken, when the result of action or operation of
 the dice is dependent upon hazard or chance, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) A first violation of this section shall be punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(c) A second offense shall be punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(d) A third or subsequent offense shall be punishable by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) nor more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and
 imprisonment.

(e) If the offense involved more than one machine or more than one location, an additional fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall be imposed per machine and per location.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 577, Sec. 1.   (AB 1753)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

330b.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to manufacture, repair, own, store, possess, sell, rent, lease, let on shares, lend or give away, transport, or expose for sale or lease, or to offer to repair, sell, rent, lease, let on shares, lend or give away, or permit the operation, placement, maintenance, or keeping of, in any place, room, space, or building owned, leased, or occupied, managed, or controlled by that person, any slot machine or device, as defined in this section.

It is unlawful for any person to make or to permit the making of an agreement with another person regarding any slot machine or device, by which the user of the slot machine or device, as a result of the element of hazard or chance or other
 unpredictable outcome, may become entitled to receive money, credit, allowance, or other thing of value or additional chance or right to use the slot machine or device, or to receive any check, slug, token, or memorandum entitling the holder to receive money, credit, allowance, or other thing of value.

(b) The limitations of subdivision (a), insofar as they relate to owning, storing, possessing, or transporting any slot machine or device, do not apply to any slot machine or device located upon or being transported by any vessel regularly operated and engaged in interstate or foreign commerce, so long as the slot machine or device is located in a locked compartment of the vessel, is not accessible for use, and is not used or operated within the territorial jurisdiction of this state.

(c) The limitations of subdivision (a) do not apply to a manufacturer’s business activities that
 are conducted in accordance with the terms of a license issued by a tribal gaming agency pursuant to the tribal-state gaming compacts entered into in accordance with the Indian Gaming Regulatory Act (18 U.S.C. Sec. 1166 to 1168, inclusive, and 25 U.S.C. Sec. 2701 et seq.).

(d) For purposes of this section, “slot machine or device” means a machine, apparatus, or device that is adapted, or may readily be converted, for use in a way that, as a result of the insertion of any piece of money or coin or other object, or by any other means, the machine or device is caused to operate or may be operated, and by reason of any element of hazard or chance or of other outcome of operation unpredictable by him or her, the user may receive or become entitled to receive any piece of money, credit, allowance, or thing of value, or additional chance or right to use the slot machine or device, or any check, slug, token, or memorandum, whether of value or
 otherwise, which may be exchanged for any money, credit, allowance, or thing of value, or which may be given in trade, irrespective of whether it may, apart from any element of hazard or chance or unpredictable outcome of operation, also sell, deliver, or present some merchandise, indication of weight, entertainment, or other thing of value.

(e) Every person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(1) A first violation of this section shall be punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(2) A second offense shall be punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by
 imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(3) A third or subsequent offense shall be punishable by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) nor more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(4) If the offense involved more than one machine or more than one location, an additional fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall be imposed per machine and per location.

(f) Pinball and other amusement machines or devices, which are predominantly games of skill, whether affording the opportunity of additional chances or free plays or not, are not included within the term slot machine or device, as
 defined in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 577, Sec. 2.   (AB 1753)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

330c.

A punchboard as hereinafter defined is hereby declared to be a slot machine or device within the meaning of Section 330b of this code and shall be subject to the provisions thereof. For the purposes of this section, a punchboard is any card, board or other device which may be played or operated by pulling, pressing, punching out or otherwise removing any slip, tab, paper or other substance therefrom to disclose any concealed number, name or symbol.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 379.)
-------------------------------------------

330.1.

(a) Every person who manufactures, owns, stores, keeps, possesses, sells, rents, leases, lets on shares, lends or gives away, transports, or exposes for sale or lease, or offers to sell, rent, lease, let on shares, lend or give away or who permits the operation of or permits to be placed, maintained, used, or kept in any room, space, or building owned, leased, or occupied by him or her or under his or her management or control, any slot machine or device as hereinafter defined, and every person who makes or permits to be made with any person any agreement with reference to any slot machine or device as hereinafter defined, pursuant to which agreement the user thereof, as a result of any element of hazard or chance, may become entitled to receive anything of value or additional chance or
 right to use that slot machine or device, or to receive any check, slug, token, or memorandum, whether of value or otherwise, entitling the holder to receive anything of value, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) A first violation of this section shall be punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(c) A second offense shall be punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(d) A third or subsequent offense shall be punishable by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) nor more than twenty-five thousand dollars
 ($25,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(e) If the offense involved more than one machine or more than one location, an additional fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall be imposed per machine and per location.

(f) A slot machine or device within the meaning of Sections 330.1 to 330.5, inclusive, of this code is one that is, or may be, used or operated in such a way that, as a result of the insertion of any piece of money or coin or other object the machine or device is caused to operate or may be operated or played, mechanically, electrically, automatically, or manually, and by reason of any element of hazard or chance, the user may receive or become entitled to receive anything of value or any check, slug, token, or memorandum, whether of value or
 otherwise, which may be given in trade, or the user may secure additional chances or rights to use such machine or device, irrespective of whether it may, apart from any element of hazard or chance, also sell, deliver, or present some merchandise, indication of weight, entertainment, or other thing of value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 202.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

330.2.

As used in Sections 330.1 to 330.5, inclusive, of this code a “thing of value” is defined to be any money, coin, currency, check, chip, allowance, token, credit, merchandise, property, or any representative of value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1950, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

330.3.

In addition to any other remedy provided by law any slot machine or device may be seized by any of the officers designated by Sections 335 and 335a of the Penal Code, and in such cases shall be disposed of, together with any and all money seized in or in connection with such machine or device, as provided in Section 335a of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1950, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

330.4.

It is specifically declared that the mere possession or control, either as owner, lessee, agent, employee, mortgagor, or otherwise of any slot machine or device, as defined in Section 330.1 of this code, is prohibited and penalized by the provisions of Sections 330.1 to 330.5, inclusive, of this code.

It is specifically declared that every person who permits to be placed, maintained or kept in any room, space, enclosure, or building owned, leased or occupied by him, or under his management or control, whether for use or operation or for storage, bailment, safekeeping or deposit only, any slot machine or device, as defined in Section 330.1 of this code, is guilty of a misdemeanor and punishable as provided in Section 330.1 of this code.

It is further declared that the provisions of this section specifically render any slot machine or device as defined in Section 330.1 of this code subject to confiscation as provided in Section 335a of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1950, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

330.5.

It is further expressly provided that Sections 330.1 to 330.4, inclusive, of this code shall not apply to music machines, weighing machines and machines which vend cigarettes, candy, ice cream, food, confections or other merchandise, in which there is deposited an exact consideration and from which in every case the customer obtains that which he purchases; and it is further expressly provided that with respect to the provisions of Sections 330.1 to 330.4, inclusive, only, of this code, pin ball, and other amusement machines or devices which are predominantly games of skill, whether affording the opportunity of additional chances or free plays or not, are not intended to be and are not included within the term slot machine or device as defined within Sections 330.1 to 330.4, inclusive, of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1950, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

330.6.

The provisions of Sections 330.1 to 330.5, inclusive, of this code, with respect to owning, storing, keeping, possessing, or transporting any slot machine or device as therein defined, shall not apply to any slot machine or device as therein defined, located upon or being transported by any vessel regularly operated and engaged in interstate or foreign commerce, so long as such slot machine or device is located in a locked compartment of the vessel, is not accessible for use and is not used or operated within the territorial jurisdiction of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1950, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

330.7.

(a) It shall be a defense to any prosecution under this chapter relating to slot machines, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 330b, if the defendant shows that the slot machine is an antique slot machine and was not operated for gambling purposes while in the defendant’s possession. For the purposes of this section, the term “antique slot machine” means a slot machine that is over 25 years of age.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 335a, whenever the defense provided by subdivision (a) is offered, no slot machine seized from a defendant shall be destroyed or otherwise altered until after a final court determination that the defense is not applicable. If the defense is applicable, the machine shall be returned pursuant to provisions of law providing for the return of property.

(c) It is the purpose of this section to protect the collection and restoration of antique slot machines not presently utilized for gambling purposes because of their aesthetic interest and importance in California history.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 268.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

330.8.

Notwithstanding Sections 330a, 330b, and 330.1 to 330.5, inclusive, the sale, transportation, storage, and manufacture of gambling devices, as defined in Section 330.1, including the acquisition of essential parts therefor and the assembly of such parts, is permitted, provided those devices are sold, transported, stored, and manufactured only for subsequent transportation in interstate or foreign commerce when that transportation is not prohibited by any applicable federal law. Those activities may be conducted only by persons who have registered with the United States government pursuant to Chapter 24 (commencing with Section 1171) of Title 15 of the United States Code, as amended. Those gambling devices shall not be displayed to the general public or sold for use in California regardless of where purchased, nor held nor manufactured in violation of any applicable federal law. A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 18.5.)
-------------------------------------------

330.9.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 330a, 330b, 330.1 to 330.5, inclusive, or any other provision of law, it shall be lawful for any person to transport and possess any slot machine or device for display at a trade show, conference, or convention being held within this state, or if used solely as a prop for a motion picture, television, or video production.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall apply only if the slot machine or device is adjusted to render the machine or device inoperable, or if the slot machine or device is set on demonstration mode.

(c) This section is intended to constitute a state exemption as provided in Section 1172 of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(d) For purposes of this section:
